Utah statutes.
57-8-6.7.   Limit on fee for approval of plans.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Plan fee" means a fee that an association of unit owners charges for review and approval of unit plans.

(b)  "Unit plans" means plans:

(i)  for the construction or improvement of a unit; and

(ii)  that are required to be approved by the association of unit owners before the unit construction or improvement may occur.

(2)  An association of unit owners may not charge a plan fee that exceeds the actual cost of reviewing and approving the unit plans.



Enacted by Chapter 152, 2013 General Session

